District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Vacant Space Art Activation Program Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Vacant Space Art Activation Program.
(a) There is established the Vacant Space Art Activation Program (“Program”) to be
administered by the Deputy Mayor of Planning and Economic Development (“DMPED”) to
incentivize property owners of vacant commercial properties to enter into short-term flexible
lease agreements with art and cultural organizations.
(b) DMPED shall solicit a list of commercial properties from Advisory Neighborhood
Commissions (“ANCs”), Business Improvement Districts (“BIDs”) and Main Street programs
that:
(1) Have had vacant ground floor retail space for at least one year; and


(2) Whose property owner agrees to consider short-term, rent-free lease
agreements with qualifying organizations until a one-year or multi-year lease agreement begins.
(c) Qualifying organizations shall include:
(1) Non-profits that provide art and cultural programming and events; and
(2) Event planning businesses that organize free arts and cultural events
accessible to the general public.
(d) Multiple organizations may apply as a group to share rented space.
(e) DMPED shall solicit proposals from qualifying organizations to activate identified
vacant commercial spaces. Application materials shall include:
(1) Description of arts and cultural programming and proposed hours and dates of
operation;
(2) Estimated budget, including staffing, security, cleaning, facility
improvements, and utilities.
(3) Proof of funds to cover estimated budget costs;
(4) Permits needed for operation, including whether alcohol will be served;
(5) Revenue generation plan and estimated revenue, if applicable;
(6) Promotional marketing plan to drive foot traffic to the property; and
(7) Any subtenants or partner organizations that will operate in the space under
the lease agreement held by the qualifying organization.
(f) The Mayor may:
(1) Waive all permit fees and costs for programming at vacant commercial spaces
locations identified by DMPED; and


(2) Exempt ground floor retail leased through the program from real property
taxation for the duration of the lease.
(g) DMPED may negotiate revenue sharing agreements between qualifying organizations
and property owners.
(h) For the purposes of this section, the term:
(1) “Business Improvement District” or “BID” shall have the same meaning as
provided in section 3 of the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996
(D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2–1215.02).
(2) “Short-term lease” means a rental agreement no longer than 3 months with the
possibility of extension.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)).